Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-666
State, defined.

State shall mean a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a province of Canada.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 162.